Washington statutes.
RCW 41.04.425

Consolidation of local governmental unit and first-class city retirement system—Limitations.

Notwithstanding any provision of RCW 41.04.410, 41.04.415, or 41.04.420:

(1) No person may simultaneously accrue any contractual rights whatsoever in more than one Washington public retirement system as a consequence of employment by a consolidated employer.

(2) No person who makes a written election permitted by RCW 41.04.410, 41.04.415, or 41.04.420 may receive a retirement allowance from such retirement system under any circumstances while employed or reemployed by the consolidated employer.

(3) No person may accrue any benefits or rights under any Washington public retirement system as a result of RCW 41.04.410, 41.04.415, or 41.04.420 except such rights of continuing membership that are specifically and explicitly granted by RCW 41.04.410, 41.04.415, or 41.04.420.

(4) Nothing in RCW 41.04.400 through 41.04.425 is intended to constitute an amendment or waiver of any law or rule of any Washington public retirement system, including but not limited to those governing eligibility for service credit, benefits, or membership, except to broaden the class of legal entities that are deemed to be participating employers in the retirement systems in the specific circumstances stated in RCW 41.04.410, 41.04.415, and 41.04.420.

[ 1984 c 184 s 27.]

NOTES:

Severability—1984 c 184: See note following RCW 41.50.150.